Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1216
Limitation of actions.

All actions in any of the courts of this state under the provisions of sections 69-1201 to 69-1217 shall be commenced within two years next after the cause of action shall accrue.

Laws 1967, c. 377, § 16, p. 1185.